src/ParadigmFeatures/Alternations/GetAlternations.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Alt1 +Alt2 +Alt3 +Alt4 +Alt5 +Alt6 +Alt7 +Alt8 +Alt9 +Alt1%0 +Alt11 +Alt12 +Alt13 +Alt14 +Alt15 +Alt16 +Alt17 +Alt18 +Alt19 +Alt2%0 +Alt21 +Alt22 +Alt23 +Alt24 +Alt25 +Alt26 +Alt27 +Alt28 +Alt29 +Alt3%0 +Alt31 +Alt32 +Alt33 +Alt34 +Alt35 +Alt36 +Alt37 +Alt38 +Alt39 +Alt4%0 +Alt41 +Alt42 +Alt43 +Alt44 +Alt45 +Alt46 +Alt47 +Alt48 +Alt49 +Alt5%0 +Alt51 +Alt52 +Alt53 +Alt54 +Alt55 +Alt56 +Alt57 +Alt58 +Alt59 +Alt6%0 +Alt61

LEXICON Root
о́ко		Alt1;
друг		Alt2_Alt12;
у́хо		Alt3;
чёрт		Alt4_Alt13;
дитя́		Alt5_Alt28;
ба́рин		Alt6;
болга́рин		Alt6;
боя́рин		Alt6;
господи́н		Alt6;
тата́рин		Alt6;
хаза́рин		Alt6;
хозя́ин		Alt6_Alt10;
су́дно		Alt7;
цвето́к		Alt8;
ку́рица		Alt9;
кум			Alt10_Alt12;
сын			#; ! в перен. знач.
сын			Alt10_Alt12; ! в прямом знач.
дре́во		Alt11;
не́бо		Alt11;
чу́до		Alt11;
брат		Alt12;
брус		Alt12;
грозд		Alt12;
де́верь		Alt12;
зять		Alt12;
клин		Alt12;
князь		Alt12;
ко́лос		Alt12;
ком			Alt12;
луб			Alt12;
муж			#; ! мужчина
муж			Alt12; ! супруг
о́бод		Alt12;
по́вод		#;
по́вод		Alt12; ! в упряжи
по́лоз		Anim;
по́лоз		Alt12Inan; ! саней
собра́т		Alt12;
струп		Alt12;
стул		Alt12;
де́рево		Alt12;
дно			Alt12;
звено́		Alt12;
коле́но		Alt12; ! сочленение
коле́но		Alt13; ! сустав
крыло́		Alt12;
перо́		Alt12;
поле́но		Alt12;
помело́		Alt12;
сило́		Alt12;
ши́ло		Alt12;
гроздь		Alt12;
дя́дя		Alt12;
сосе́д		Alt13;
слюна́		Alt13;
маслёнок	Alt14;
опёнок		Alt14;
бесёнок		Alt15;
чертёнок	Alt15;
ребёнок		Alt16;
челове́к		Alt17;
госпо́дь		Alt18;
Христо́с		Alt19;
бере́мя		Alt20;
бре́мя		Alt20;
вре́мя		Alt20;
вы́мя		Alt20;
зна́мя		Alt20;
и́мя		Alt20;
пла́мя		Alt20;
пле́мя		Alt20;
полуи́мя		Alt20;
те́мя		Alt20;
се́мя		Alt21;
стре́мя		Alt21;
дочь		Alt22;
мать		Alt22;
по́лдень		Alt23;
по́лночь		Alt23;
ба́рышня		#;
ку́хня		#;
дере́вня		#;
пешня́		Alt24;
шестерня́	Alt24;
год			Alt25;
це́рковь		Alt26;
расхля́банный		Alt29;
опосре́дствованный		Alt29;
пре́данный		Alt29;
противопока́занный		Alt29;
обя́занный		Alt29;
свя́занный		Alt29;
общепризнанный		Alt29;
поме́шанный		Alt29;
предубеждённый		Alt29;
врождённый		Alt29;
измождённый		Alt29;
обнажённый		Alt29;
поло́женный		Alt29;
располо́женный		Alt29;
предрасполо́женный		Alt29;
благорасположенный		Alt29;
изнеможённый		Alt29;
подвёрженный		Alt29;
привёрженный		Alt29;
сопряжённый		Alt29;
раздро́бленный		Alt29;
влюблённый		Alt29;
предустано́вленный		Alt29;
осведомлённый		Alt29;
зачумлённый		Alt29;
вы́мышленный		Alt29;
увёренный		Alt29;
намёренный		Alt29;
угнетённый		Alt29;
обречённый		Alt29;
расфранчённый		Alt29;
разви́нченный		Alt29;
малоизученный		Alt29;
лишённый		Alt29;
искушённый		Alt29;
разобщённый		Alt29;
польщённый		Alt29;
смяте́нный		Alt29;
солёный			Alt30;
ма́ленький		Alt31;
большо́й			Alt32;
согбе́нный		Alt33;
забвенный		Alt33;
незабве́нный		Alt33;
самозабве́нный		Alt33;
благослове́нный		Alt33;
дерзнове́нный		Alt33;
прикоснове́нный		Alt33;
вдохнове́нный		Alt33;
сокрове́нный		Alt33;
блаже́нный		Alt33;
растле́нный		Alt33;
неоцене́нный		Alt33;
презре́нный		Alt33;
смире́нный		Alt33;
неизрече́нный	Alt33;
свяще́нный		Alt33;
вы́спренний		Alt33;
и́скренний		Alt35;
тот			Alt36;
э́тот		Alt36_Alt37;
оди́н		Alt37;
сам			Alt37;
сей			Alt38;
не́кий		Alt39;
не́кий		Alt40;
э́кий		Alt40;
кто			Alt41;
что			Alt41;
никто́		Alt41;
ничто́		Alt41;
во́семь		#;
во́семь		Alt42;
пятьдеся́т		Alt43_Alt58;
шестьдеся́т		Alt43_Alt58;
се́мьдесят		Alt43_Alt58;
во́семьдесят		Alt43_Alt58;
во́семьдесят		Alt42_Alt43_Alt58;
о́ба			Alt44_Alt54;
я			Alt45_Alt55_Alt57;
ты			Alt46_Alt56_Alt57;
мы			Alt47;
он			Alt48;
она́			Alt48;
оно́			Alt48;
они́			Alt49Alt48;
две́сти		Alt49Alt59;
полтора́		Alt50;
полтора́ста	Alt50;
три			Alt51_Alt52;
четы́ре		Alt51_Alt53;
два			Alt52;
себя́		Alt56_Alt57;
пятьсо́т		Alt58;
шестьсо́т	Alt58;
семьсо́т		Alt58;
восемьсо́т	Alt58;
восемьсо́т	Alt42_Alt58;
девятьсо́т	Alt58;
три́ста		Alt60;
четы́реста	Alt61;

LEXICON Alt1
+Alt1	#;

LEXICON Alt2_Alt12
+Alt2+Alt12	#;

LEXICON Alt3
+Alt3	#;

LEXICON Alt4_Alt13
+Alt4+Alt13	#;

LEXICON Alt5_Alt28
+Alt5+Alt28	#;

LEXICON Alt6
+Alt6	#;

LEXICON Alt6_Alt10
+Alt6+Alt1%0	#;

LEXICON Alt6_Alt12
+Alt6+Alt12	#;

LEXICON Alt7
+Alt7	#;

LEXICON Alt8
+Alt8	#;

LEXICON Alt9
+Alt9	#;

LEXICON Alt10_Alt12
+Alt1%0+Alt12	#;

LEXICON Alt11
+Alt11	#;

LEXICON Alt12
+Alt12	#;

LEXICON Alt13
+Alt13	#;

LEXICON Alt14
+Alt14	#;

LEXICON Alt15
+Alt15	#;

LEXICON Alt16
+Alt16	#;

LEXICON Alt17
<%+Alt17 %+Subst1 \%+ParDef8* %+Anim> #;

LEXICON Alt18
+Alt18	#;

LEXICON Alt19
+Alt19	#;

LEXICON Alt20
+Alt2%0+Alt2%7	#;

LEXICON Alt21
+Alt21+Alt27	#;

LEXICON Alt22
+Alt22	#;

LEXICON Alt23
+Alt23	#;

LEXICON Alt24
+Alt24	#;

LEXICON Alt25
+Alt25	#;

LEXICON Alt26
+Alt26	#;

LEXICON Alt29
+Alt29	#;

LEXICON Alt30
+Alt3%0	#;

LEXICON Alt31
+Alt31	#;

LEXICON Alt32
+Alt32	#;

LEXICON Alt33
+Alt33	#;

LEXICON Alt35
+Alt35	#;

LEXICON Alt36
+Alt36	#;

LEXICON Alt36_Alt37
+Alt36+Alt37	#;

LEXICON Alt37
+Alt37	#;

LEXICON Alt38
+Alt38	#;

LEXICON Alt39
+Alt39	#;

LEXICON Alt40
+Alt4%0	#;

LEXICON Alt41
+Alt41	#;

LEXICON Alt42
+Alt42	#;

LEXICON Alt42_Alt43_Alt58
+Alt42+Alt43+Alt58	#;

LEXICON Alt42_Alt58
+Alt42+Alt58	#;

LEXICON Alt43_Alt58
+Alt43+Alt58	#;

LEXICON Alt44_Alt54
+Alt44+Alt54	#;

LEXICON Alt45_Alt55_Alt57
+Alt45+Alt55+Alt57	#;

LEXICON Alt46_Alt56_Alt57
+Alt46+Alt56+Alt57	#;

LEXICON Alt47
+Alt47	#;

LEXICON Alt48
+Alt48	#;

LEXICON Alt49
+Alt49          #;

LEXICON Alt49Alt48
+Alt49+Alt48	#;

LEXICON Alt49Alt59
+Alt49+Alt59	#;

LEXICON Alt50
+Alt5%0	#;

LEXICON Alt51_Alt52
+Alt51+Alt52	#;

LEXICON Alt51_Alt53
+Alt51+Alt53	#;

LEXICON Alt52
+Alt52	#;

LEXICON Alt56_Alt57
+Alt56+Alt57	#;

LEXICON Alt58
+Alt58	#;

LEXICON Alt60
+Alt6%0	#;

LEXICON Alt61
+Alt61	#;

LEXICON Alt12Inan
+Alt12	Inan;

LEXICON Anim
<%+Subst1 ?* %+Anim>		#;

LEXICON Inan
<%+Subst1 ?* %+Inan>		#;
